Nebraska, session 109, LB233.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB233 LB233
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 84-1607, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-1607 (1) The group life insurance contract or contracts may
permit the extension of special benefits, such as accidental death and
dismemberment benefits, amounts of life insurance in addition to the
amount provided in section 84-1605, and the extension of coverage to
dependents. Any coverage under this section shall be borne solely by the
employee.
(2) The special coverages permitted by this section shall be made
available uniformly to all employees, but each employee shall retain the
option to choose the special coverage or coverages which he or she
desires or to reject all such special coverages.
Sec. 2. Section 84-1608, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-1608 (1) The group health insurance contract or contracts may
permit the extension of special benefits, such as insurance over and
above that provided by the basic coverage specified in section 84-1605,
dental health insurance, disability insurance, accidental death and
dismemberment benefits, disability income replacement benefits, and the
extension of coverage to dependents. Any coverage under this section may
be borne solely by the employee.
(2) The special coverages permitted by this section shall be made
available uniformly to all employees, but each employee shall retain the
option to choose the special coverage or coverages which he or she
desires or to reject all such special coverages.
Sec. 3. Section 84-1609, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
84-1609 (1) Beginning July 1, 2025, the Nebraska State Insurance
Program shall include coverage for in vitro fertilization.
(2) In providing the coverage required under subsection (1) of this
section, the program may:
-2-

LB233 LB233
2025 2025
(a) Limit coverage to a lifetime maximum benefit of four completed
egg retrievals;
(b) Limit coverage to those individuals who have been unable to
conceive or produce conception or sustain a successful pregnancy through
less expensive and medically viable infertility treatment or procedures
covered under the program, except that nothing in this subdivision shall
be construed to deny the coverage required by this section to any
individual who foregoes a particular infertility treatment or procedure
if the individual's physician determines that such treatment or procedure
is likely to be unsuccessful; and
(c) Require that covered treatment or procedures be performed at
facilities that conform to the standards and guidelines developed by the
American Society for Reproductive Medicine or the Society for
Reproductive Endocrinology and Infertility.
The special coverages permitted by sections 84-1607 and 84-1608
shall be made available uniformly to all employees, but each employee
shall retain the option to choose the special coverage or coverages which
he or she desires or to reject all such special coverages.
Sec. 4. Original sections 84-1607, 84-1608, and 84-1609, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 5. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-3-